Maine, session 132, LD961.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §2102, sub-§2-A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 316, §1, is further
amended by amending the 2nd blocked paragraph to read:
Page 1 - 132LR0926(03)

A Until the board has adopted rules to establish practice standards pursuant to section
2205-B, subsection 4-A, a certified nurse practitioner who qualifies as an advanced practice
registered nurse must practice, for at least 24 months, under the supervision of a licensed
physician or a supervising nurse practitioner or must be employed by a clinic or hospital
that has a medical director who is a licensed physician. The certified nurse practitioner
shall submit written evidence to the board upon completion of the required clinical
experience.
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §2102, sub-§10, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 316, §2, is
repealed and the following enacted in its place:
A. Met the requirements of section 2205-B, subsection 4-A specified by the board in
rule;
Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §2102, sub-§10, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 316, §2, is
amended to read:
B. Practiced as an advanced practice registered nurse for a minimum of 5 years in the
same speciality specialty;
Sec. 4. 32 MRSA §2205-B, sub-§4-A is enacted to read:
4-A. Approval of certified nurse practitioner. A certified nurse practitioner who
qualifies as an advanced practice registered nurse must meet practice standards specified
in rule by the board related to:
A. The length of time a certified nurse practitioner must practice as an advanced
practice registered nurse;
B. Based on experience and licensing status, the minimum amount of time a certified
nurse practitioner must practice with a supervising nurse practitioner serving in a
mentorship role to the certified nurse practitioner;
C. The practice setting of a certified nurse practitioner, including consideration of any
requirements for employment by a clinic or hospital that has a supervising nurse
practitioner within the clinic or hospital serving in a mentorship role to a certified nurse
practitioner; and
D. Any other factors determined necessary by the board.
A certified nurse practitioner shall demonstrate compliance with the practice standards
required under this subsection in the form and manner required by the board. The board
may adopt rules as necessary to implement the requirements of this subsection. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 5. State Board of Nursing rulemaking; submission of proposed
practice standards. No later than March 15, 2026, the State Board of Nursing shall
submit proposed practice standards for certified nurse practitioners, as required by the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 32, section 2205-B, subsection 4-A, to the Joint Standing
Committee on Health Coverage, Insurance and Financial Services for review. The joint
standing committee may report out a bill to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd
Legislature relating to the practice standards for certified nurse practitioners.
Notwithstanding Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2, the State Board of Nursing may not
Page 2 - 132LR0926(03)

adopt any rules before May 1, 2026 relating to the practice standards for certified nurse
practitioners as required by Title 32, section 2205-B, subsection 4-A.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 3 - 132LR0926(03)